src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON present
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@%>%{ая%} PresPret1 ; ! 1,2  Present
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@%>ӧ PresPret1-SgPl3 ; ! 3

LEXICON present_KYJNY
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@%>%{ая%} PresPret1 ; ! 1,2  Present
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@%>ӧ PresPret1-SgPl3 ; ! 3

LEXICON present_AMNY
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@%>%{ая%} PresPret1 ; ! 1,2  Present
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@%>ӧ PresPret1-SgPl3 ; ! 3

LEXICON present_KUTNY
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@%>%{ая%} PresPret1 ; ! 1,2  Present
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@%>ӧ PresPret1-SgPl3 ; ! 3

LEXICON future
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@+Ind+Fut:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@%>%{ая%} PresPret1 ; ! 1,2  Future
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Ind+Fut:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>%{ая%}с FutPret1-SgPl3 ; ! 3 FutPret1-SgPl3   ХХХ check this

LEXICON future_KYJNY
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@+Ind+Fut:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@%>%{ая%} PresPret1 ; ! 1,2  Future
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Ind+Fut:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>%{ая%}с FutPret1-SgPl3 ; ! 3 FutPret1-SgPl3   ХХХ check this

LEXICON future_AMNY
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@+Ind+Fut:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@%>%{ая%} PresPret1 ; ! 1,2  Future
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Ind+Fut:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>%{ая%}с FutPret1-SgPl3 ; ! 3 FutPret1-SgPl3   ХХХ check this

LEXICON future_KUTNY
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@+Ind+Fut:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@%>%{ая%} PresPret1 ; ! 1,2  Future
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Ind+Fut:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>%{ая%}с FutPret1-SgPl3 ; ! 3 FutPret1-SgPl3   ХХХ check this

LEXICON preterite
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@+Ind+Prt1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@%>%{иі%} PresPret1 ; 
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@+Ind+Prt1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@%>%{иі%}  P3 ; ! 3 
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@+Ind+Prt2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@%>ӧм Pret2a ;

LEXICON preterite_KYJNY
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@+Ind+Prt1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@%>и PresPret1 ; 
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@+Ind+Prt1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@%>и  P3 ; ! 3 
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@+Ind+Prt2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@%>ӧм Pret2a ;

LEXICON preterite_AMNY
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@+Ind+Prt1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@%>и PresPret1 ; 
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@+Ind+Prt1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@%>и  P3 ; ! 3 
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@+Ind+Prt2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@%>ӧм Pret2a ;

LEXICON preterite_KUTNY
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@+Ind+Prt1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@%>%{иі%} PresPret1 ; 
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@+Ind+Prt1:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@%>%{иі%}  P3 ; ! 3 
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@+Ind+Prt2:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@%>ӧм Pret2a ;

LEXICON imperative
@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@+Imprt+Pl2:@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@%>ӧ VerbEnd ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** kpv -ӧй

LEXICON PossessiveSuffixes
+PxSg1:%>ым K ;
            PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ;


LEXICON PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1
+NoPoss:     K ;
+PxSg2:%>ыт  K ;
+PxSg3:%>ыс  K ;
+PxPl1:%>ным K ;
+PxPl2:%>ныт K ;
+PxPl3:%>ныс K ;


LEXICON PresPret1  ! First and second person
@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.1@+Sg1:@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.1@%>  VerbEnd-Comparison ; 
@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@+Sg2:@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@%>н VerbEnd-Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@+Pl1:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@%>м VerbEnd-Comparison ; 
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@+Pl1+Err/Orth:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@%>мӧ VerbEnd-Comparison ; 
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@+Pl1:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@%>мӧй VerbEnd-Comparison ;  ! imperatiivi / optatiivi ??
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@+Pl2:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@%>т VerbEnd-Comparison ; 

LEXICON P3         
@U.CONJ-PX.3@:@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>с FutPret1-SgPl3 ; ! This is regular
!@U.CONJ-PX.3@  PresPret1-SgPl3 ; ! This is usually restricted to intransitives


LEXICON PresPret1-SgPl3
  SG3 ; 
  PL3 ;
  
LEXICON SG3
@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Sg3:@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
  
LEXICON PL3
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Pl3:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>ны VerbEnd-Comparison ;
!+Pl300@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@:%>ны@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;

LEXICON FutPret1-SgPl3
Fut/Pret1-Sg3 ;
Fut/Pret1-Pl3 ;
LEXICON Fut/Pret1-Sg3
@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Sg3:@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
LEXICON Fut/Pret1-Pl3
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Pl3:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>ӧ VerbEnd-Comparison ;


LEXICON Pret2a
:а PRET2-linkki-a ;
   PRET2PL2 ; 
   PL3 ;   ! for continuation in different persons. 
                  !Could also have used the homonymic participle
                  ! as point of departure
!! Differs from kpv 2016-09-15
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@+Pl1:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@%>ӧсь VerbEnd-Comparison ; 
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Pl3:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>ӧсь VerbEnd-Comparison ;
 

LEXICON PRET2PL2
@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@+Sg2:@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@%>ыт VerbEnd-Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@+Sg2:@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@%>%{ая%}т VerbEnd-Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@+Pl2:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@%>ныт VerbEnd-Comparison ;
@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Sg3:@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ VerbEnd-Comparison ; !2016.10.25 Цыпанов 1999: 64
!+Pl2000000@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@:%>нытӧсь@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@ VerbEnd-Comparison ; !224
!+Pl300@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@:%>ны@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ VerbEnd-Comparison ; !227

LEXICON PRET2-linkki-a
!+Sg1+Err/Orth: VerbEnd-Comparison ; ! no Sg1 for Prt2 in the standard
@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.1@+Sg1:@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.1@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;  
@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Sg3:@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
!+Pl1+Err/Orth:%>ӧсь VerbEnd-Comparison ; ! no Pl1 for Prt2 in the standard
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@+Pl1:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@%>сь VerbEnd-Comparison ; 
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Pl3:@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>сь VerbEnd-Comparison ;

LEXICON MatrixVerb-Comparison
               K ;
+Der+Der/AdvCompMod:%>моз K ;
+Comp:%>жык K ;
+Der+Der/CompMod:%>кодь K ;

!This is where Serial verbs are made possible
LEXICON VerbEnd-Comparison
 Serial-Verbs ;
 MatrixVerb-Comparison ;

LEXICON VerbEnd
 Serial-Verbs ;
 WordEnd ;

LEXICON Serial-Verbs
+Cmp/Serial+Cmp#:%-# Verbs ;
+Cmp/Serial+Cmp#:%-# V_NEWWORDS ;


!! ## Derivation
! ==========

LEXICON Non-finiteforms
VerbDer ; ! to be merged with next
          !2011-11-02 dealing with serial verbs there may be
          ! reason to distinguish between V2V derivation and non-finite forms

LEXICON Verb-nyDer !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
Verb-nyDer-ONSET-CONS ;
Verb-nyDer-ONSET-VOW ;

LEXICON Verb-nyDer-ONSET-CONS !!≈ * **@CODE@** Derivation onset in consonant
!! verb-to-verb

!! This is fed by LEXICON V_SHUNY, and therefore certain corrections
!! must be made 2012-01-18

@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/лы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>л  V_VOLYNY ; !!босьтлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/лывлы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>лывл V_VOLYNY ; !!босьтлывлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/сьы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>сь V_LYDDJYNY ; !! овсьыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/сьы+Der/ышт:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>сьышт V_SHUNY ; !!вежсьыштны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/сьы+Der/ышт+Der/лывлы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>сьыштлывл V_VOLYNY ; !! пусьыштлывлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/сьы+Der/ышт+Der/лы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>сьыштл V_VOLYNY ; !!?? пусьыштлыны
! зь:зь  !!югзьыны
! Why do the suffixes above have ">" marking
! while the ones below do not?
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/чы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ч V_LYDDJYNY ; !!босьтчыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/чы+Der/л:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@чыл V_SHUNY ; !!дӧзмӧдчывны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/чы+Der/ышт+Der/лы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@чыштл V_VOLYNY ; !!босьтчыштлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/чы+Der/ышт+Der/лывлы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@чыштлывл V_VOLYNY ; !! босьтчыштлывлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/чы+Der/ышт:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@чышт V_SHUNY ; !!босьтчыштны

LEXICON Verb-nyDer-ONSET-VOW !!≈ * **@CODE@** Derivation onset	in vowel
 Verb-nyDer-ONSET-Y ;
 Verb-nyDer-ONSET-A ;

LEXICON Verb-nyDer-ONSET-Y !!≈ * **@CODE@** Derivation onset	in vowel
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ышт+Der/лы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ыштл V_VOLYNY ;   !!сёйыштлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ышт+Der/лывлы:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ыштлывл V_VOLYNY ;  !!сёйыштлывлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ышт:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ышт V_SHUNY ; !!сёйыштны

LEXICON Verb-nyDer-ONSET-A !!≈ * **@CODE@** Derivation onset	in vowel
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/Al:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ал V_SHUNY ; !!сетавны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/овт:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@овт V_SHUNY ; !!пановтны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/Asj:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ась V_SHUNY ; !! босьтасьны

LEXICON Verb-nyDer-ONSET-JA !!≈ * **@CODE@** Derivation onset	in vowel
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/Al:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ял V_SHUNY ; !!сетавны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/овт:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ёвт V_SHUNY ; !!пановтны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/Asj:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ясь V_SHUNY ; !! босьтасьны


!! verb-to-noun
 
LEXICON VerbDer !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
 VerbDer-ONSET_OE ; !! FIX THIS 2015-09-06

LEXICON VerbDer_KYJNY !!≈ * **@CODE@**
:й VerbDer-ONSET_OE ; !!≈ * **@CODE@**
:й VerbDer-ONSET_JA ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
:й VerbDer-ONSET_JI ; !!≈ * **@CODE@**

LEXICON VerbDer_KUTNY !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 VerbDer-ONSET_OE ; !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 VerbDer-ONSET_A ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
 VerbDer-ONSET_JI ; !!≈ * **@CODE@**

LEXICON VerbDer_ARTASJNY !!≈ * **@CODE@**
: VerbDer-ONSET_OE ; !!≈ * **@CODE@**
: VerbDer-ONSET_JA ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
: VerbDer-ONSET_JI ; !!≈ * **@CODE@**

LEXICON VerbDer-ONSET_OE !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Der/ӧм+Event:%>ӧм Noun1 ;
+Der/ӧм+Event+N+Ins:%>ӧмӧн K ;
+Der/Omon+Ger:%>ӧмӧн K ;
+Der/Omon+Ger+Comp:%>ӧмӧнжык K ;
+Der/ісь+ActPrsPtc:%>%{иі%}сь N_ ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** kpv ысь

LEXICON VerbDer-ONSET_JI !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
  ! nonfinites
+Der/Ik+Ger+Cmpl:%>%{иі%}к K ; ! gerund no plural as in kpv (at the same time as the action)
!352 Pl
+Der/Ik+Ger+Ill:%>%{иі%}кӧ K ;
+Der/Ik+Ger+Ill+PxSg1:%>%{иі%}кам K ;
+Der/Ik+Ger+Ill+PxSg2:%>%{иі%}кат K ;
+Der/Ik+Ger+Ill+PxSg3:%>%{иі%}кас K ;
+Der/Ik+Ger+Ill+PxPl1:%>%{иі%}каным K ;
+Der/Ik+Ger+Ill+PxPl2:%>%{иі%}каныт K ;
+Der/Ik+Ger+Ill+PxPl3:%>%{иі%}каныс K ;


LEXICON VerbDer-ONSET_A !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+ANA+Adv:%>%{ая%}на K ;
+ANAA+Adv:%>%{ая%}наа K ; !Adding after attestation in Komi Grammar 2000: 381
+AN+Der+Der/AdvCompMod:%>%{ая%}нмоз PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !383

LEXICON VerbDer-ONSET_JA !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+ANA+Adv:%>%{ая%}на K ;
+ANAA+Adv:%>%{ая%}наа K ; !Adding after attestation in Komi Grammar 2000: 381
+AN+Der+Der/AdvCompMod:%>%{ая%}нмоз PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !383
